Idaho, session 2026, H0500.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-615, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-615. DRIVERS TO EXERCISE DUE CARE. Notwithstanding other provi-
sions of this title or the provisions of any local ordinance, every driver of
a motor vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedes-
trian or any person propelling operator or rider of a human-powered vehicle,
bicycle, or electric-assisted bicycle and shall give an audible signal when
necessary. Every driver of a motor vehicle shall exercise proper precaution
upon observing any child or any obviously confused, incapacitated, or intox-
icated person.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-714. TRAFFIC LAWS APPLY TO PERSONS ON BICYCLES AND OTHER HUMAN-POW-
ERED VEHICLES OPERATORS OR RIDERS OF HUMAN-POWERED VEHICLES, BICYCLES, OR
ELECTRIC-ASSISTED BICYCLES -- DUE CARE. (1) Every person operating a vehi-
cle propelled by human power or riding a bicycle Every operator or rider of a
human-powered vehicle, bicycle, or electric-assisted bicycle shall have all
of the rights and all of the duties applicable to the driver of any other ve-
hicle under the provisions of chapters 6 and 8 of this title, except as oth-
erwise provided in this chapter and except as to those provisions which by
their nature can have no application.
(2) Every operator or rider of a bicycle or human-powered vehicle
human-powered vehicle, bicycle, or electric-assisted bicycle shall exer-
cise due care.
SECTION 3. That Section 49-715, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-715. RIDING ON BICYCLES HUMAN-POWERED VEHICLES, BICYCLES, OR ELEC-
TRIC-ASSISTED BICYCLES. (1) A person propelling a bicycle shall not No oper-
ator or rider of a human-powered vehicle, bicycle, or electric-assisted bi-
cycle shall ride other than upon on or astride an attached permanent and reg-
ular seat.


(2) No bicycle or human-propelled vehicle human-powered vehicle, bicy-
cle, or electric-assisted bicycle shall be used to carry more persons at one
(1) time than the number for which it is designed and equipped.
(3) An adult rider may carry a child securely attached to his person in a
backpack or sling or in a child carrier attached to the bicycle a human-pow-
ered vehicle, bicycle, or electric-assisted bicycle.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.